es: Interfaz del eje pedalier: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Eje cuadrado (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Otro
it: Interfaccia del movimento centrale: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Perno quadro (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Altro
da: Krankboks-kontaktflade: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Firkantet (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Andet
sk-SK: Medzičlánok stredového ložiska: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Štvorhran (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Iné
fi: Keskiön tyyppi: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Nelikulma-akseli (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Muu
fr: Interface de boîtier de pédalier: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Axe carré (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Autre
tr: Orta göbek arayüzü: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Kare mil (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Diğer
lt-LT: Miniklio veleno sąsaja: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Kvadratinis siaurėjantis (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Kita
ro-RO: Interfața butucului de pedalier: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Pătrat conic (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Altele
pt-PT: Interface do eixo pedaleiro: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Cone quadrado (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Outro
bg-BG: Интерфейс на долната конзола: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Square taper (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Друго
zh-TW: 中軸介面: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; 四方孔 (JIS); Ultra-Torque; 其他
pt-BR: Interface do movimento central: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Ponta quadrada (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Outros
zh-CN: 中轴接口: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; 方孔 (JIS); Ultra-Torque; 其他
nb: Kranklagergrensesnitt: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Firkantaksling (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Annet
pl: Interfejs suportu: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Na kwadrat (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Inne
sv: Fäste för nedre vevarm: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Fyrkantsaxel (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Annan
vi: Giao diện trục giữa: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Trục vuông (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Khác
ru: Интерфейс каретки: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 мм); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Квадрат (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Другое
nl: Trapas interface: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Vierkante as (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Overige
hr-HR: Sučelje donje osovine: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Kvadratni konus (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Ostalo
en: Bottom bracket interface: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Square taper (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Other
hu: Középcsapágy csatlakozófelület: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Négyszögtengelyes (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Egyéb
de: Tretlagerschnittstelle: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Vierkant (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Sonstige
cs: Rozhraní středového složení: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Čtyřhran (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Jiné
sl-SI: Vmesnik gonilnega ležaja: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Kvadratna os (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Drugo
el: Διεπαφή κάτω βραχίονα: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; Τετράγωνο καρέ (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Άλλο
ko: 바텀 브래킷 인터페이스: BB30; DUB; GXP; 할로우테크 II(24mm); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; 사각 테이퍼(JIS); Ultra-Torque; 기타
ja: ボトムブラケットインターフェース: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II（24 mm）; ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; スクエアテーパー（JIS）; Ultra-Torque; その他
th: รูปแบบการเชื่อมต่อกับกระโหลกจักรยาน: BB30; DUB; GXP; Hollowtech II (24 มม.); ISIS Drive; Octalink; PF30; แกนเหลี่ยม (JIS); Ultra-Torque; อื่นๆ